Utah statutes.
48-2a-608.   Liability upon return of contribution.
(1)  If a partner has received the return of any part of his contribution
without violation of the partnership agreement or this chapter, he is liable
to the limited partnership for a period of one year thereafter for the amount
of the returned contribution, but only to the extent necessary to discharge
the limited partnership's liabilities to creditors who extended credit to the
limited partnership during the period the contribution was held by the
partnership.
(2)  If a partner has received the return of any part of his contribution in
violation of the partnership agreement or this chapter, he is liable to the
limited partnership for a period of six years thereafter for the amount of the
contribution wrongfully returned.
(3)  A partner receives a return of his contribution to the extent that a
distribution to him reduces his share of the fair value of the net assets of
the limited partnership below the value, as set forth in the partnership
records required to be kept under Section 48-2a-105, of his contribution to
the extent that it has been made, less any previous return of contributions.
